Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1123.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1706XC (2) 91 dg/ko S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 598.21C, subsection 1, paragraph k, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 k. (1) Entry of a dispositional or permanency an order 3 in juvenile court pursuant to chapter 232 placing custody or 4 physical care of a child with a party who is obligated to pay 5 support for a the child. Any filing fees or court costs for a 6 modification filed or ordered pursuant to this paragraph are 7 waived. 8 (2) (a) The court that entered an order for child support 9 or medical support may enter an ex parte order suspending the 10 child support or medical support under this paragraph upon 11 receiving an application from the party obligated to pay the 12 child support or medical support. The application must contain 13 the county, docket number, and date of the order that placed 14 the custody or physical care of the child with the party 15 obligated to pay the child support or medical support. An ex 16 parte order suspending child support or medical support shall 17 be effective on the date the ex parte order is entered. 18 (b) If the court subsequently orders custody or physical 19 care of the child returned to the party owed child support 20 or medical support, upon receiving an application from the 21 party owed child support or medical support, the court may 22 enter an ex parte order terminating the ex parte order under 23 subparagraph division (a). The application must contain the 24 county, docket number, and date of the order that returned the 25 custody or physical care of the child to the party owed child 26 support or medical support. An ex parte order terminating 27 an ex parte order under subparagraph division (a) shall be 28 effective on the date the ex parte order is entered. 29 (c) A person, including but not limited to a party obligated 30 to pay child support or medical support, the party owed child 31 support or medical support, and child support services, may 32 file an objection to an ex parte order entered under this 33 subparagraph within fifteen calendar days of the date the 34 ex parte order is entered. The clerk of the district court 35 -1- LSB 1706XC (2) 91 dg/ko 1/ 3 S.F. _____ shall schedule a hearing on the objection not later than seven 1 calendar days after the date the objection is filed and shall 2 provide notice of the hearing to the parties. 3 (d) The supreme court shall prescribe a standard form 4 to be used by a party submitting an application under this 5 subparagraph, and distribute the form to the clerks of the 6 district court. 7